nb: Elektronikk > Kommunikasjon > Telefoni > Mobiltelefontilbehør > Verktøy for reparasjon av mobiltelefoner: Åpne- og vippeverktøy til mobiltelefon; Verktøysett til reparasjon av mobiltelefon; Mobiltelefon-skrutrekkere
nl: Elektronica > Communicatie > Telefonie > Accessoires voor mobiele en slimme telefoons > Reparatiegereedschap voor mobiele telefoons: Mobiele telefoon open- en breekgereedschap; Mobiele telefoon reparatie gereedschapsset; Mobiele telefoon schroevendraaiers
it: Elettronica > Comunicazioni > Telefonia > Accessori per cellulari e smartphone > Strumenti per la riparazione dei telefoni cellulari: Strumenti di apertura e leva del telefono cellulare; Kit di strumenti di riparazione del telefono cellulare; Cacciaviti del telefono cellulare
vi: Thiết bị điện tử > Thiết bị liên lạc > Điện thoại > Phụ kiện điện thoại di động & điện thoại thông minh > Dụng cụ sửa chữa điện thoại di động: Dụng cụ mở và giãng điện thoại; Bộ kit dụng cụ sửa chữa điện thoại; Tuốc vít điện thoại
sl-SI: Elektronika > Komunikacija > Telefonija > Dodatki za mobilne in pametne telefone > Orodja za popravilo mobilnih telefonov: Orodja za odpiranje mobilnih telefonov; Kompleti orodij za popravilo mobilnih telefonov; Izvijači za mobilne telefone
sv: Elektronik > Kommunikation > Telefoni > Mobil- och smarttelefontillbehör > Verktyg för reparation av mobiltelefoner: Öppnings- och bändverktyg för mobiltelefoner; Reparationssatser för mobiltelefoner; Skruvmejslar för mobiltelefoner
ja: 電子機器 > 通信機器 > 電話 > 携帯電話・スマートフォン用アクセサリー > 携帯電話用修理ツール: スマホ分解用オープニングツール; スマホ修理用工具セット; スマホ用精密ドライバー
fi: Elektroniikka > Viestintä > Puhelinliikenne > Matka- ja älypuhelinten tarvikkeet > Matkapuhelinten korjaustyökalut: Matkapuhelimen avaus- ja viputyökalut; Matkapuhelimen korjaussarjat; Matkapuhelimen ruuvimeisselit
cs: Elektronika > Komunikace > Telefony > Příslušenství pro mobilní a chytré telefony > Nástroje pro opravu mobilních telefonů: Nástroje pro otevírání mobilních telefonů; Sady nástrojů na opravu mobilních telefonů; Šroubováky na mobilní telefony
ro-RO: Electronice > Comunicații > Telefonie > Accesorii pentru telefoane mobile și inteligente > Instrumente de reparare a telefoanelor mobile: Instrumente de deschidere și despărțire pentru telefoane mobile; Kituri de instrumente pentru reparații telefoane mobile; Șurubelnițe pentru telefoane mobile
fr: Appareil électronique > Communications > Téléphonie > Accessoires pour téléphones portables et smartphones > Outils de réparation pour téléphones portables: Outils d’ouverture et leviers pour téléphone portable; Kits d’outils de réparation pour téléphone portable; Tournevis pour téléphone portable
pt-PT: Eletrónica > Comunicações > Telefonia > Acessórios para telemóvel e smartphones > Ferramentas para reparação de telemóveis: Ferramentas de abertura e alavancagem para telemóvel; Kit de ferramentas de reparação para telemóvel; Chaves de fendas para telemóvel
da: Elektronik > Kommunikation > Telefoni > Mobiltelefon- og smartphonetilbehør > Værktøj til reparation af mobiltelefoner: Mobiltelefon – værktøjer til åbning; Mobiltelefon – reparationsværktøjssæt; Mobiltelefon – skruetrækkere
sk-SK: Elektronika > Komunikačné zariadenia > Telefonovanie > Príslušenstvo pre mobilné telefóny a smartfóny > Náradie na opravu mobilných telefónov: Otváracie a páčiace nástroje na mobilné telefóny; Súpravy opravných nástrojov na mobilné telefóny; Skrutkovače na mobilné telefóny
hu: Elektronika > Kommunikáció > Telefonálás > Mobil- és okostelefon-kiegészítők > Mobiltelefon-javító eszközök: Mobiltelefon nyitó és feszítő eszközei; Mobiltelefon-javító készletek; Mobiltelefon-csavarhúzók
ko: 전자기기 > 통신 > 전화 > 휴대전화/스마트폰 부대용품 > 휴대폰 수리 도구: 휴대폰 개봉 및 분해 도구; 휴대폰 수리 도구 키트; 휴대폰 드라이버
es: Electrónica > Comunicación > Telefonía > Accesorios para teléfonos móviles y inteligentes > Herramientas de reparación de teléfonos móviles: Herramientas de apertura y palanca de teléfono móvil; Kit de herramientas de reparación de teléfono móvil; Destornilladores de teléfono móvil
bg-BG: Електроника > Комуникации > Телефония > Аксесоари за мобилни и смарттелефони > Инструменти за ремонт на мобилни телефони: Инструменти за отваряне на мобилен телефон; Комплекти инструменти за ремонт на мобилен телефон; Отвертки за мобилен телефон
ru: Электроника > Связь > Телефония > Аксессуары для мобильных телефонов и смартфонов > Инструменты для ремонта мобильных телефонов: Инструменты для вскрытия мобильных телефонов; Наборы инструментов для ремонта мобильных телефонов; Отвертки для мобильных телефонов
pl: Elektronika > Telekomunikacja > Telefonia > Akcesoria do telefonów komórkowych i smartfonów > Narzędzia do naprawy telefonów komórkowych: Narzędzia do otwierania i rozruszania telefonu komórkowego; Zestawy narzędzi do naprawy telefonu komórkowego; Wkrętak do telefonu komórkowego
el: Ηλεκτρονικά > Επικοινωνίες > Τηλεφωνία > Αξεσουάρ κινητών και έξυπνων τηλεφώνων > Εργαλεία επισκευής κινητών τηλεφώνων: Εργαλεία ανοίγματος & μοχλού κινητού τηλεφώνου; Κιτ εργαλείων επισκευής κινητού τηλεφώνου; Κατσαβίδια κινητού τηλεφώνου
lt-LT: Elektronika > Ryšiai > Telefonija > Mobiliųjų ir išmaniųjų telefonų priedai > Mobiliųjų telefonų taisymo įrankiai: Mobiliojo telefono atidarymo ir ardymo įrankiai; Mobiliojo telefono remonto įrankių rinkiniai; Mobiliojo telefono atsuktuvai
zh-CN: 电子产品 > 通讯 > 电话 > 手机和智能手机配件 > 手机维修工具: 手机拆机与撬棒工具; 手机维修工具套装; 手机螺丝刀
en: Electronics > Communications > Telephony > Mobile & Smart Phone Accessories > Mobile Phone Repair Tools: Mobile Phone Opening & Pry Tools; Mobile Phone Repair Tool Kits; Mobile Phone Screwdrivers
hr-HR: Elektronika > Komunikacija > Telefonija > Dodaci za mobitele i pametne telefone > Alati za popravak mobilnih telefona: Alati za otvaranje i popravak mobilnih telefona; Kompleti alata za popravak mobilnih telefona; Odvijači za mobilne telefone
de: Elektronik > Kommunikationsgeräte > Telefone > Zubehör für Mobiltelefone und Smartphones > Handy-Reparaturwerkzeuge: Mobiltelefon-Öffnungs- und Hebelwerkzeuge; Mobiltelefon-Reparaturwerkzeugsets; Mobiltelefon-Schraubendreher
zh-TW: 電子器材 > 通訊設備 > 電話設備 > 手機和智慧型手機配件 > 手機維修工具: 手機開殼與撬棒工具; 手機維修工具組; 手機螺絲起子
pt-BR: Eletrônicos > Comunicações > Telefonia > Acessórios para celulares e smartphones > Ferramentas de reparo de celulares: Ferramentas de abertura e alavanca para celular; Kit de ferramentas de reparo para celular; Chaves de fenda para celular
tr: Elektronik > Haberleşme > Telefon İletişimi > Cep Telefonu ve Akıllı Telefon Aksesuarları > Cep Telefonu Tamir Araçları: Cep Telefonu Açma Ve Kaldıraç Araçları; Cep Telefonu Onarım Araç Kitleri; Cep Telefonu Tornavidaları
th: อิเล็กทรอนิกส์ > การสื่อสาร > การโทรศัพท์ > อุปกรณ์เสริมโทรศัพท์มือถือและสมาร์ทโฟน > เครื่องมือซ่อมโทรศัพท์มือถือ: เครื่องมือแงะและงัดโทรศัพท์มือถือ; ชุดเครื่องมือซ่อมโทรศัพท์มือถือ; ไขควงโทรศัพท์มือถือ